Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
Drug Court Program

26A.400.
Drug court program — Administration — No right to treatment conferred — Exemption from division supervision while in program.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, “drug court program” means any drug court program authorized and administered by the Kentucky Supreme Court.

The Supreme Court of Kentucky shall administer the drug court program to:

Develop standards, establish program eligibility, and provide oversight for operation for drug court programs;

Define, develop, and gather outcome measures for drug court programs;

Collect, report, and disseminate drug court data;

Sponsor and coordinate state drug court training; and

Apply for, administer, and evaluate any grant for drug court purposes.

Nothing contained in this section shall confer a right or an expectation of a right to treatment for an offender within the criminal justice system or the juvenile justice system.

If a defendant has been accepted into the drug court program and is supervised by that program as a condition of probation, the defendant shall not be subject to the supervision of the Division of Probation and Parole during his or her participation in the drug court program.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 25, effective June 8, 2011; 2012, ch. 156, § 10, effective July 12, 2012.